California statutes. Education Code
(a) Conduct studies through research and investigation as are determined by it to be required in connection with the present and future management, conditions, needs, and financial support of the schools; or join with other school district governing boards in the conduct of such studies.

(b) Install and maintain exhibits of educational programs and activities of the school district at any county fair held in the county in which the district is located in whole or in part, or at any agricultural district fair held in the county in which the school district is located in whole or in part.

(c) Inform and make known to the citizens of the district, the educational programs and activities of the schools therein.

(d) Subscribe for membership for any school under its jurisdiction in any society, association, or organization which has for its purpose the promotion and advancement of public or private education.

(e) Subscribe for membership in, or otherwise become a member of, any national, state or local organization of governing boards of school districts or members thereof which has for its purposes the promotion and advancement of public education through research and investigation, and the cooperation with persons and associations whose interests and purposes are the betterment of the educational opportunities of the children of the state.

(f) Select a member or members of the board to attend meetings of any society, association, or organization for which the school district has subscribed for membership, or any convention to which it may pay the expenses of any employee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35175.

The powers and duties of boards of education in cities are as prescribed in the laws governing the respective cities, except as otherwise provided by this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35177.

The governing board of a district may by resolution limit campaign expenditures or contributions in elections to district offices.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35178.

A member of the governing board of a school district who has tendered a resignation with a deferred effective date pursuant to Section 5090 shall, until the effective date of the resignation, continue to have the right to exercise all powers of a member of the governing board, except that such member shall not have the right to vote for his or her successor in an action taken by the board to make a provisional appointment pursuant to Section 5091.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 267.)
-------------------------------------------

35178.4.

(a) A school district governing board shall give official notice at a regularly scheduled school board meeting if a public school within the district that has elected to be accredited by the Western Association of Schools and Colleges (WASC) or any other chartered accrediting agency loses its accreditation status.

(b) If a school loses its accreditation status, the school district shall notify each parent or guardian of the pupils in the school that the school has lost its accreditation status, in writing, and this notice shall indicate the potential consequences of the school’s loss of accreditation status. This notice shall also be posted on the school district’s Internet Web site and the school’s Internet Web site, if any.

(c) A school district that has within its jurisdiction a school that has elected to be accredited by WASC or any other chartered accrediting agency shall require that school to publish all results of any inspection of the school by the accrediting agency not later than 60 days after the results are made available to the school. Publication shall be either by notifying each parent or guardian in writing or by posting the information on the school district’s Internet Web site or the school’s Internet Web site, or by any combination of these methods, as determined by the school district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 402, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Interscholastic Athletics [35179. - 35179.8.]

35179.

(a) Each school district governing board shall have general control of, and be responsible for, all aspects of the interscholastic athletic policies, programs, and activities in its district, including, but not limited to, eligibility, season of sport, number of sports, personnel, and sports facilities. In addition, the board shall ensure that all interscholastic policies, programs, and activities in its district are in compliance with state and federal law.

(b) Governing boards may enter into associations or consortia with other boards for the purpose of governing regional or statewide interscholastic athletic programs by permitting the public schools under their jurisdictions to enter into a voluntary association with other schools for the purpose of enacting and enforcing rules relating to eligibility for, and participation in, interscholastic athletic programs among and between schools.

(c) Each governing board, or its designee, shall represent the individual schools located within its jurisdiction in any voluntary association of schools formed or maintained pursuant to this section.

(d) No voluntary interscholastic athletic association, of which any public school is a member, shall discriminate against, or deny the benefits of any program to, any person on any basis prohibited by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 200) of Part 1.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no voluntary interscholastic athletic association shall deny a school from participating in interscholastic athletic activities because of the religious tenets of the school, regardless of whether that school is directly controlled by a religious organization.

(f) Interscholastic athletics is defined as those policies, programs, and activities that are formulated or executed in conjunction with, or in contemplation of, athletic contests between two or more schools, either public or private.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 63.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

35179.1.

(a) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as the 1998 California High School Coaching Education and Training Program.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The exploding demand in girls athletics, and an increase in the number of pupils participating in both boys and girls athletics, are causing an increase in the number of coaches needed statewide.

(2) Well-trained coaches are vital to the success of the experience of a pupil in sports and interscholastic athletic activities.

(3) Improvement in coaching is a primary need identified by
 hundreds of principals, superintendents, and school board members who participated in the development of a strategic plan for the California Interscholastic Federation (CIF) in 1993 and 1994.

(4) There are many concerns about safety, training, organization, philosophy, communications, and general management in coaching that need to be addressed.

(5) It is a conservative estimate that at least 25,000 coaches annually need training and an orientation just to meet current coaching regulations contained in Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, including basic safety and CPR requirements.

(6) School districts, in conjunction with the California Interscholastic Federation, have taken the initial first steps
 toward building a statewide coaching education program by assembling a faculty of statewide trainers composed of school district administrators, coaches, and athletic directors using a national program being used in several states.

(c) It is, therefore, the intent of the Legislature to establish a California High School Coaching Education and Training Program. It is the intent of the Legislature that the program be administered by school districts, be updated and rehearsed annually, and emphasize the following components:

(1) Development of coaching philosophies
 consistent with school, school district, and governing board of a school district goals.

(2) Sport psychology: emphasizing communication, reinforcement of the efforts of pupils, effective delivery of coaching regarding technique, and motivation of the pupil athlete.

(3) Sport pedagogy: how pupil athletes learn, and how to teach sport skills.

(4) Sport physiology: principles of training, fitness for sport, development of a training program, nutrition for athletes, and the harmful effects associated with the use of steroids and performance-enhancing dietary supplements by adolescents.

(5) Sport management: team management, risk management, and working
 within the context of an entire school program.

(6) Training: certification in CPR, use of an automated external defibrillator (AED), and first aid that includes, but is not limited to, training in recognizing the signs and symptoms of, and responding to, concussions, heat illness, and, by July 1, 2024, cardiac arrest. Certification in CPR and use of an AED shall be consistent with national evidence-based emergency cardiovascular care guidelines. Concussion, heat illness, and cardiac arrest training may be provided by entities offering free, online, or other types of training
 courses. For purposes of this section, “heat illness” includes heat cramps, heat syncope, heat exhaustion, and exertional heat stroke.

(7) Knowledge of, and adherence to, statewide rules and regulations, as well as school regulations, including, but not necessarily limited to, eligibility, gender equity, and discrimination.

(8) Sound planning and goal setting.

(d) This section does not endorse a particular coaching education or training program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 422, Sec. 1.   (AB 245)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

35179.2.

(a) Subject to funds being appropriated for this purpose in the annual Budget Act, the California Interscholastic Federation is encouraged to establish a statewide panel that includes, at a minimum, the following members: school administrators, school board members, coaches of secondary school athletics, teachers, parents, athletic directors, representatives of higher education, pupils participating in athletics at the secondary school level, and a representative of the State Department of Education, as described in Section 35179.3.

(b) The panel established pursuant to subdivision (a) is encouraged to develop an application process whereby public secondary schools may submit applications to the State Department of Education for grants to offset the costs of education and training of athletic coaches in an education and training program that emphasizes the components set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 35179.1.

(c) The panel established pursuant to subdivision (a) is encouraged to evaluate applications submitted to the State Department of Education pursuant to subdivision (b) and to recommend applicants to the State Department of Education for the award of dollar-for-dollar matching grants, in an amount determined by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1032, Sec. 1.   Effective September 28, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

35179.3.

If the California Interscholastic Federation establishes a statewide panel pursuant to Section 35179.2, the State Department of Education shall do all of the following:

(a) Provide a department representative to assist the panel in developing an application and grant distribution process.

(b) Review recommendations submitted by the panel for the award of dollar-for-dollar matching grants to public secondary school applicants.

(c) Determine which public secondary school applicants will receive dollar-for-dollar matching grants.

(d) Determine the amount of the grants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 744, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

35179.4.

If a school district or charter school elects to offer any interscholastic athletic program, the governing board of the school district or the governing body of the charter school shall ensure that there is a written emergency action plan in place that describes the location of emergency medical equipment and procedures to be followed in the event of sudden cardiac arrest and other medical emergencies, including concussion and heat illness, related to the athletic program’s activities or events.
 By July 1, 2024, the emergency action plan shall include a description of the manner and frequency at which the procedures to be followed in the event of sudden cardiac arrest and other medical emergencies, including concussion and heat illness, which shall be based on the training described in paragraph (6) of subdivision (c) of Section 35179.1, will be rehearsed. The written emergency action plan shall be posted in compliance with the most recent pertinent guidelines of the National Federation of State High School Associations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 589, Sec. 1.5.   (AB 1653)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

35179.5.

(a) (1) If a school district, charter school, or private school elects to offer an athletic program, it shall comply with all of the following:

(A) A high school or middle school football team shall not conduct more than two full-contact practices per week during the preseason and regular season.

 (B) The full-contact portion of a practice shall not exceed 90 minutes in any single day.

(C) A high school or middle school football team shall not hold a full-contact practice during the off-season.

(2) For purposes of this section, a team camp session shall be deemed to be a practice.

(b) The California Interscholastic Federation is urged to develop and adopt rules to implement this section.

(c) As used in this section:

(1) “Full-contact practice” means a practice where drills or live action is conducted that involves collisions at game speed, where players execute tackles and other activity that is typical of an actual tackle football game.

(2) “Off-season” means a period extending from the end of the regular season until 30 days before the commencement of the next regular season.

(3) “Preseason” means a period of 30 days before the commencement of the regular
 season.

(4) “Regular season” means the period from the first interscholastic football game or scrimmage until the completion of the final interscholastic football game of that season.

(d) This section shall not prohibit the California Interscholastic Federation, an interscholastic athletic league, a school, a school district, or any other appropriate entity from adopting and enforcing rules intended to provide a higher standard of safety for athletes than the standard established under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 165, Sec. 2.   (AB 2127)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

35179.6.

(a) For purposes of this section, “AED” means an automated external defibrillator.

(b) (1) Commencing July 1, 2019, if a school district or charter school elects to offer any interscholastic athletic program, the school district or the charter school shall acquire at least one AED for each school that participates in the program within the jurisdiction of the school district or the charter school. The school district or the charter school is encouraged to ensure that the AED or AEDs are available for the purpose of rendering emergency care or treatment within a recommended three to five minutes of sudden cardiac arrest to pupils, spectators, and any other individuals in attendance at the athletic program’s on-campus activities or events, and shall ensure that the AED or AEDs are available to athletic trainers and coaches and authorized persons at these activities or events.

(2) If a school district or charter school elects to sponsor or host, in or around a swimming pool, an on-campus event that is not part of an interscholastic athletic program, the school district or charter school shall require at least one adult with a valid certification of cardiopulmonary resuscitation training to be present throughout the duration of the event. The presence of an adult
 with cardiopulmonary resuscitation training, as mandated by the California Interscholastic Federation coaching education program requirements, would satisfy this paragraph.

(c) Subdivision (b) of Section 49417 applies for purposes of determining if an employee of a school district is liable for any civil damages resulting from the employee’s use, attempted use, or nonuse of an AED in the rendering of emergency care or treatment pursuant to this section.

(d) Subdivision (c) of Section 49417 applies for purposes of determining if a public school or school district is liable for any civil damages resulting from any act or omission in the rendering of emergency care or treatment pursuant to this section.

(e) Except
 as provided in subdivision (g), if an employee of a charter school complies with Section 1714.21 of the Civil Code in rendering emergency care or treatment through the use, attempted use, or nonuse of an AED at the scene of an emergency, the employee is not liable for any civil damages resulting from any act or omission in the rendering of the emergency care or treatment.

(f) Except as provided in subdivision (g), if a charter school complies with the requirements of Section 1797.196 of the Health and Safety Code, the charter school is covered by Section 1714.21 of the Civil Code, and is not liable for any civil damages resulting from any act or omission in the rendering of the emergency care or treatment.

(g) Subdivisions (e) and (f) do not apply in the case of personal injury
 or wrongful death that results from gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct on the part of the person who uses, attempts to use, or fails to use an AED to render emergency care or treatment.

(h) In order to ensure public safety, each school district or charter school that elects to offer any interscholastic athletic program shall ensure that its AED or AEDs are maintained and regularly tested according to the operation and maintenance guidelines set forth by the manufacturer, the American Heart Association, or the American Red Cross, and according to any applicable rules and regulations set forth by the governmental authority under the federal Food and Drug Administration and any other applicable state and federal authority.

(i) This section does not alter the
 requirements of Section 1797.196 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 679, Sec. 2.   (SB 722)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

35179.7.

The State Board of Education shall adopt rules and regulations establishing standards of ethical conduct applicable to each temporary, probationary, or permanent employee of a school district providing supervision and instruction in interscholastic athletic programs and activities. These standards shall include, at a minimum, rules and regulations prohibiting these employees from exerting undue influence in a pupil’s decision to enroll in an athletic program at any public or private postsecondary educational institution, or from otherwise influencing a pupil’s decision to enroll in an athletic program for his or her personal gain.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 694, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

35179.8.

(a) In order to better protect student athletes participating in athletics, no later than July 1, 2024, the California Interscholastic Federation, in consultation with the department, shall develop guidelines, procedures, and safety standards for the prevention and management of exertional heat illness.

(b) Guidelines developed pursuant to this section shall identify the environmental conditions at which a school shall limit and prohibit practice and play. These guidelines shall include information regarding the accurate measurement of environmental heat stress at the site of the athletic activity, including the use of Wet Bulb Globe Temperature (WBGT)
 to determine ambient temperature, relative humidity, wind speed, and solar radiation from the sun, including sun angle and cloud cover.

(c) Guidelines developed pursuant to this section shall identify the environmental conditions at which a school shall have a method to institute whole-body cooling to treat a student athlete with exertional heat illness, especially heat stroke, that is easily accessible at all practice and contest venues.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 589, Sec. 2.   (AB 1653)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.7. Miscellaneous Administrative Authority [35181. - 35186.]

35181.

The governing board of each school district may convene hearings, make findings, and adopt and issue policy statements setting forth the responsibilities of the pupils of that school district regarding academic performance, attendance, in-school behavior, and any other aspects of school life which the school district governing board may deem relevant to this task.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 302, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

35182.

The governing board of any school district may market or license any noneducational mainframe electronic data-processing software developed by the school district to any person or any public or private corporation or agency. Proceeds from the marketing or licensing of noneducational mainframe electronic data-processing software under this section shall be used exclusively for educational purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 607, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

35182.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) State and federal laws require all schools participating in meal programs to provide nutritious food and beverages to pupils.

(2) State and federal laws restrict the sale of food and beverages in competition with meal programs to enhance the nutritional goals for pupils, and to protect the fiscal and nutritional integrity of the school food service programs.

(3) Parents, pupils, and community members should have the opportunity to ensure, through the review of food and beverage contracts, that food
 and beverages sold on school campuses provide nutritious sustenance to pupils, promote good health, help pupils learn, provide energy, and model fit living for life.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Nonnutritious beverages” means any beverage that is not any of the following:

(A) Drinking water.

(B) Milk, including, but not limited to, chocolate milk, soy milk, rice milk, almond milk, and other similar dairy or nondairy milk.

(C) An electrolyte replacement beverage that contains 42 grams or less of added sweetener per 20 ounce serving.

(D) A 100 percent fruit juice, or fruit-based drink that is composed of 50 percent or more fruit juice and that has no added sweeteners.

(2) “Added sweetener” means an additive that enhances the sweetness of the beverage, including, but not limited to, added sugar, but does not include the natural sugar or sugars that are contained within any fruit juice that is a component of the beverage.

(3) “Nonnutritious food” means food that is not sold as part of the school breakfast or lunch program as a full meal, and that meets any of the following standards:

(A) More than 35 percent of its total calories are from fat.

(B) More than 10 percent of its total calories are from saturated fat.

(C) More than 35 percent of its total weight is composed of sugar. This subparagraph does not apply to the sale of fruits or vegetables.

(c) The governing board of a school district shall not do any of the following:

(1) Enter into or renew a contract, or permit a school within the school district to enter into or renew a contract, that grants exclusive or nonexclusive advertising or grants the right to the exclusive or nonexclusive sale of carbonated beverages, nonnutritious beverages, or nonnutritious food within the school district to a person, business, or corporation, unless the governing board of the school district does all
 of the following:

(A) Adopts a policy after a public hearing of the governing board of the school district to ensure that the school district has internal controls in place to protect the integrity of the public funds and to ensure that funds raised benefit public education, and that the contracts are entered into on a competitive basis pursuant to procedures contained in Section 20111 of the Public Contract Code or through the issuance of a request for proposal.

(B) Provides to parents, guardians, pupils, and members of the public the opportunity to comment on the contract by holding a public hearing on the contract during a regularly scheduled meeting of the governing board of the school district. The governing board of the school district shall clearly, and in a manner
 recognizable to the general public, identify in the agenda the contract to be discussed at the meeting.

(2) Enter into a contract that prohibits a school district employee from disparaging the goods or services of the party contracting with the governing board of the school district.

(3) Enter into a contract or permit a school within the school district to enter into a contract for electronic products or services that requires the dissemination of advertising to pupils, unless the governing board of the school district does all of the following:

(A) Enters into the contract at a noticed public hearing of the governing board of the school district.

(B) Makes a
 finding that the electronic product or service in question is or would be an integral component of the education of pupils.

(C) Makes a finding that the school district cannot afford to provide the electronic product or service unless it contracts to permit dissemination of advertising to pupils.

(D) Provides written notice to the parents or guardians of pupils that the advertising will be used in the classroom or other learning centers. This notice shall be part of the school district’s normal ongoing communication to parents or guardians.

(E) Offers the parents the opportunity to request in writing that the pupil not be exposed to the program that contains the advertising. A request shall be honored for the school year
 in which it is submitted, or longer if specified, but may be withdrawn by the parent or guardian at any time.

(d) A governing board of the school district may meet the public hearing requirement set forth in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) for those contracts that grant the right to the exclusive or nonexclusive sale of carbonated beverages, nonnutritious beverages, or nonnutritious food within the school district, by an annual public hearing to review and discuss existing and potential contracts for the sale of food and beverages on campuses, including food and beverages sold as full meals, through competitive sales, as fundraisers, and through vending machines.

(1) The public hearing shall include, but not be limited to, a discussion of all of the
 following:

(A) The nutritional value of food and beverages sold within the school district.

(B) The availability of fresh fruit, vegetables, and grains in school meals and snacks, including, but not limited to, locally grown and organic produce.

(C) The amount of fat, sugar, and additives in the food and beverages discussed.

(D) Barriers to pupil participation in school breakfast and lunch programs.

(2) A school district that holds an annual public hearing consistent with this subdivision is not released from the public hearing requirements set forth in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1)
 of subdivision (c) for those contracts not discussed at the annual public hearing.

(e) The governing board of the school district shall make accessible to the public a contract entered into pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) and shall not include in that contract a confidentiality clause that would prevent a school or school district from making any part of the contract public.

(f) The governing board of a school district may sell advertising, products, or services on a nonexclusive basis.

(g) The governing board of a school district may post public signs indicating the school district’s appreciation for the support of a person or business for the school district’s education program.

(h) Contracts entered into before January 1, 2004, may remain in effect, but shall not be renewed if they are in conflict with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 382, Sec. 1.   (AB 691)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

35183.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares each of the following:

(1) The children of this state have the right to an effective public school education. Both students and staff of the primary, elementary, junior and senior high school campuses have the constitutional right to be safe and secure in their persons at school. However, children in many of our public schools are forced to focus on the threat of violence and the messages of violence contained in many aspects of our society, particularly reflected in gang regalia that disrupts the learning environment.

(2) “Gang-related apparel” is hazardous to the health and safety of the school environment.

(3) Instructing teachers and administrators on the subtleties of identifying constantly changing gang regalia and gang affiliation takes an increasing amount of time away from educating our children.

(4) Weapons, including firearms and knives, have become common place upon even our elementary school campuses. Students often conceal weapons by wearing clothing, such as jumpsuits and overcoats, and by carrying large bags.

(5) The adoption of a schoolwide uniform policy is a reasonable way to provide some protection for students. A required uniform may protect students from being associated with any particular gang. Moreover, by requiring schoolwide uniforms teachers and administrators may not need to occupy as much of their time learning the subtleties of gang regalia.

(6) To control the environment in public schools to facilitate and maintain an effective learning environment and to keep the focus of the classroom on learning and not personal safety, schools need the authorization to implement uniform clothing requirements for our public school children.

(7) Many educators believe that school dress significantly influences pupil behavior. This influence is evident on school dressup days and color days. Schools that have adopted school uniforms experience a “coming together feeling,” greater school pride, and better behavior in and out of the classroom.

(b) The governing board of any school district may adopt or rescind a reasonable dress code policy that requires pupils to wear a schoolwide uniform or prohibits pupils from wearing “gang-related apparel” if the governing board of the school district approves a plan that may be initiated by an individual school’s principal, staff, and parents and determines that the policy is necessary for the health and safety of the school environment. Individual schools may include the reasonable dress code policy as part of its school safety plan, pursuant to Section 32281.

(c) Adoption and enforcement of a reasonable dress code policy pursuant to subdivision (b) is not a violation of Section 48950. For purposes of this section, Section 48950 shall apply to elementary, high school, and unified school districts. If a schoolwide uniform is required, the specific uniform selected shall be determined by the principal, staff, and parents of the individual school.

(d) A dress code policy that requires pupils to wear a schoolwide uniform shall not be implemented with less than six months’ notice to parents and the availability of resources to assist economically disadvantaged pupils.

(e) The governing board shall provide a method whereby parents may choose not to have their children comply with an adopted school uniform policy.

(f) If a governing board chooses to adopt a policy pursuant to this section, the policy shall include a provision that no pupil shall be penalized academically or otherwise discriminated against nor denied attendance to school if the pupil’s parents chose not to have the pupil comply with the school uniform policy. The governing board shall continue to have responsibility for the appropriate education of those pupils.

(g) A policy adopted pursuant to this section shall not preclude pupils that participate in a nationally recognized youth organization from wearing organization uniforms on days that the organization has a scheduled meeting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 828, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

35183.1.

(a) A pupil may wear traditional tribal regalia or recognized objects of religious or cultural significance, as determined by the pupil and the pupil’s family, as an adornment at school graduation ceremonies or related school events.

(b) A local educational agency shall not require either of the following:

(1) A preapproval process for a pupil to exercise the pupil’s rights pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) A pupil to wear a cap if the cap is incompatible with the adornment.

(c) This section does
 not limit a local educational agency’s discretion and authority to prohibit an item that is likely to cause a substantial disruption of, or material interference with, the ceremony.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Adornment” means either of the following:

(A) Something attached to,
 worn with,
 or worn in place of, the cap
 customarily worn at school graduation ceremonies.

(B) Something attached to or worn with, but not replacing, the gown customarily worn at school graduation ceremonies.

(2) “Cultural” means recognized practices and traditions of a certain group of people.

(3) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 133, Sec. 1.   (AB 1369)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

35183.3.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person shall have the right to wear a dress uniform issued to him or her by a branch of the United States Armed Forces while participating in the graduation ceremony for his or her high school if that person meets both of the following requirements:

(a) He or she has fulfilled all of the requirements of this code for receiving a diploma of graduation from high school, and is otherwise eligible to participate in the graduation ceremony.

(b) He or she has completed basic
 training for, and is an active member of, a branch of the United States Armed Forces.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 296, Sec. 1.   (AB 1463)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

35183.5.

(a) (1) Each schoolsite shall allow for outdoor use during the schoolday, articles of sun-protective clothing, including, but not limited to, hats.

(2) Each schoolsite may set a policy related to the type of sun-protective clothing, including, but not limited to, hats, that pupils will be allowed to use outdoors pursuant to paragraph (1). Specific clothing and hats determined by the school district or schoolsite to be gang-related or inappropriate apparel may be prohibited by the dress code policy.

(b) (1) Each schoolsite shall allow pupils the use of sunscreen during the schoolday without a physician’s note or prescription.

(2) Each schoolsite may set a policy related to the use of sunscreen by pupils during the schoolday.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, sunscreen is not an over-the-counter medication.

(4) Nothing in this subdivision requires school personnel to assist pupils in applying sunscreen.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 266, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

35184.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the governing board of a high school district may enter into a contract with the governing board of any of its feeder elementary school districts to provide instruction at the schools of the high school district to all or a portion of the pupils enrolled in the sixth grade at the contracting elementary school district.

(b) For the purpose of computing allowances and apportionments pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 41600) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 42230) of Chapter 7 of Part 24, the contracting elementary school shall continue to report average daily attendance for those sixth grade pupils. Upon receipt of any funds allocated to the elementary school district based upon the average daily attendance reported for those sixth grade pupils, the contracting elementary school district shall transfer those moneys to the contracting high school district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1296, Sec. 3.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

35185.

A school district may require proof of registration pursuant to Article 8.2 (commencing with Section 12620) of Chapter 6 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, as a condition to agreement to enroll that student.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 825, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

35186.

(a) A school district shall use the uniform complaint process it has adopted as required by Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, with modifications, as necessary, to help identify and resolve any deficiencies related to instructional materials, emergency or urgent facilities conditions that pose a threat to the health and safety of pupils or staff, and teacher vacancy or misassignment.

(1) A complaint may be filed anonymously. A complainant who identifies themselves is entitled to a response if the complainant indicates that a response is requested. A complaint form shall include a space to mark to indicate
 whether a response is requested. If Section 48985 is otherwise applicable, the response, if requested, and report shall be written in English and the primary language in which the complaint was filed. All complaints and responses are public records.

(2) The complaint form shall specify the location for filing a complaint. A complainant may add as much text to explain the complaint as the complainant wishes.

(3) A complaint shall be filed with the principal of the school or the principal’s designee. A complaint about problems beyond the authority of the school principal shall be forwarded in a timely manner but not to exceed 10 working days to the appropriate school district official for resolution.

(b) The principal
 or the designee of the district superintendent, as applicable, shall make all reasonable efforts to investigate any problem within their authority. The principal or designee of the
 district superintendent shall remedy a valid complaint within a reasonable time period but not to exceed 30 working days from the date the complaint was received. The principal or designee of the district superintendent shall report to the complainant the resolution of the complaint within 45 working days of the initial filing. If the principal makes this report, the principal shall also report the same information in the same timeframe to the designee of the district superintendent.
